Utah statutes.
39-6-90.   Sale, waste, or destruction of military property.

A person subject to this chapter shall be punished as a military court directs who, regarding any military property of the United States or of the state, without authority:

(1)  sells or otherwise disposes of it;

(2)  willfully or through neglect damages, destroys, or loses it; or

(3)  willfully or through neglect suffers it to be lost, damaged, destroyed, sold, or wrongfully disposed of.

